Wisconsin, session 2025, SB691.
do enact as follows:SB691,11Section 1. 125.02 (1e) (a) of the statutes is created to read:SB691,2,22125.02 (1e) (a) The art of painting.SB691,23Section 2. 125.02 (1e) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB691,2,44125.02 (1e) (b) Candlemaking.SB691,35Section 3. 125.02 (11m) of the statutes is renumbered 125.02 (1e) (intro.) 6and amended to read:SB691,2,117125.02 (1e) (intro.) “Painting Art studio” means an establishment that is 8primarily engaged in the business of providing to customers instruction in the art of 9painting any of the following and that offers customers the opportunity to purchase 10food and beverages for consumption while they paint. engage in the activity in 11which they are being instructed:SB691,412Section 4. 125.07 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB691,2,2313125.07 (3) (a) 3. Hotels, drug stores, grocery stores, bowling centers, movie 14theaters, painting art studios, billiards centers having on the premises 12 or more 15billiards tables that are not designed for coin operation and that are 8 feet or longer 16in length, indoor golf simulator facilities, indoor golf and baseball facilities on 17premises for which the only alcohol beverage license issued is a Class “B” license, 18axe throwing facilities on premises operated under Class “B” or “Class B” licenses, 19service stations, vessels, cars operated by any railroad, regularly established 20athletic fields, outdoor volleyball courts that are contiguous to a licensed premises, 21stadiums, music festival venues during an event with a projected attendance of at 22least 2,500 persons, public facilities as defined in s. 125.51 (5) (b) 1. d. which are 23owned by a county or municipality or centers for the visual or performing arts.SB691,524Section 5. 125.32 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB691,3,61125.32 (3) (c) Hotels and restaurants the principal business of which is the 2furnishing of food and lodging to patrons, bowling centers, movie theaters, painting 3art studios, indoor golf and baseball facilities, racetrack grounds, as defined in s. 4125.27 (5) (a), indoor horseshoe-pitching facilities, curling clubs, golf courses and 5golf clubhouses may remain open for the conduct of their regular business but may 6not sell fermented malt beverages during the hours specified in par. (a).SB691,67Section 6. 125.32 (3m) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB691,3,88125.32 (3m) (i) A painting An art studio.SB691,79Section 7. 125.68 (4) (c) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB691,3,1610125.68 (4) (c) 4. Hotels and restaurants the principal business of which is the 11furnishing of food, drinks or lodging to patrons, bowling centers, movie theaters, 12painting art studios, racetrack grounds, as defined in s. 125.27 (5) (a), indoor 13horseshoe-pitching facilities, curling clubs, golf courses and golf clubhouses may 14remain open for the conduct of their regular business but may not sell intoxicating 15liquor during the closing hours under subd. 1. or, with respect to the sale of 16intoxicating liquor authorized under s. 125.51 (3r) (a), under subd. 3.SB691,3,1717